Hawaii, session 2026, HB1430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 453-4.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§453-4.5  Foreign medical graduates; alternative qualifications. Notwithstanding section 453-4(b)(2)(B), a graduate of a foreign medical school who has [passed]: (1)  Passed the Federation Licensing Examination (FLEX) or the United States Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE), or a combination of these examinations as approved by the board, with scores deemed satisfactory to the board[, passed]; (2)  Passed the qualifying examination of the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates prior to 1984[,]; and [has at] (3)  At least three years of medical training or experience in a hospital approved by the Council on Medical Education and Hospitals of the American Medical Association for internship or residency; provided that one of the three years of medical training or experience may be substituted by one year of fellowship training where the parent program or hospital is accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education; may be licensed by the Hawaii medical board under section 453‑4(c)." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________